Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-807
Violations; penalty.

Any person violating the provisions of sections 46-801 to 46-807 shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, § 7, p. 859;

C.S.1922, § 8486;

C.S.1929, § 81-6407;

R.S.1943, § 81-708;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 268.